xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.aff
FLAG long
SFX c1 ébrer èbrerions/n' ébrer
SFX c1 écer ècerions/n' écer
SFX c1 écher ècherions/n' écher
SFX c1 écrer ècrerions/n' écrer
SFX c1 éder èderions/n' éder
SFX c1 éger ègerions/n' éger
SFX c1 égler èglerions/n' égler
SFX c1 égner ègnerions/n' égner
SFX c1 égrer ègrerions/n' égrer
SFX c1 éguer èguerions/n' éguer
SFX c1 éler èlerions/n' éler
SFX c1 émer èmerions/n' émer
SFX c1 éner ènerions/n' éner
SFX c1 éper èperions/n' éper
SFX c1 équer èquerions/n' équer
SFX c1 érer èrerions/n' érer
SFX c1 éser èserions/n' éser
SFX c1 éter èterions/n' éter
SFX c1 étrer ètrerions/n' étrer
SFX c1 évrer èvrerions/n' évrer
SFX c1 éyer èyerions/n' éyer
SFX c1 er eriez/n' er
SFX c1 ébrer èbreriez/n' ébrer
SFX c1 écer èceriez/n' écer
SFX c1 écher ècheriez/n' écher
SFX c1 écrer ècreriez/n' écrer
SFX c1 éder èderiez/n' éder
SFX c1 éger ègeriez/n' éger
SFX c1 égler ègleriez/n' égler
SFX c1 égner ègneriez/n' égner
SFX c1 égrer ègreriez/n' égrer
SFX c1 éguer ègueriez/n' éguer
SFX c1 éler èleriez/n' éler
SFX c1 émer èmeriez/n' émer
SFX c1 éner èneriez/n' éner
SFX c1 éper èperiez/n' éper
SFX c1 équer èqueriez/n' équer
SFX c1 érer èreriez/n' érer
SFX c1 éser èseriez/n' éser
SFX c1 éter èteriez/n' éter
SFX c1 étrer ètreriez/n' étrer
SFX c1 évrer èvreriez/n' évrer
SFX c1 éyer èyeriez/n' éyer
SFX c1 er eraient/n'q' er
SFX c1 ébrer èbreraient/n'q' ébrer
SFX c1 écer èceraient/n'q' écer
SFX c1 écher ècheraient/n'q' écher
SFX c1 écrer ècreraient/n'q' écrer
SFX c1 éder èderaient/n'q' éder
SFX c1 éger ègeraient/n'q' éger
SFX c1 égler ègleraient/n'q' égler
SFX c1 égner ègneraient/n'q' égner
SFX c1 égrer ègreraient/n'q' égrer
SFX c1 éguer ègueraient/n'q' éguer
SFX c1 éler èleraient/n'q' éler
SFX c1 émer èmeraient/n'q' émer
SFX c1 éner èneraient/n'q' éner
SFX c1 éper èperaient/n'q' éper
SFX c1 équer èqueraient/n'q' équer
SFX c1 érer èreraient/n'q' érer
SFX c1 éser èseraient/n'q' éser
SFX c1 éter èteraient/n'q' éter
SFX c1 étrer ètreraient/n'q' étrer
SFX c1 évrer èvreraient/n'q' évrer
SFX c1 éyer èyeraient/n'q' éyer
SFX c1 er asse/n'j' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçasse/n'j' écer
SFX c1 éger égeasse/n'j' éger
SFX c1 er asses/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçasses/n' écer
SFX c1 éger égeasses/n' éger
SFX c1 er ât/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçât/n'q' écer
SFX c1 éger égeât/n'q' éger
SFX c1 er assions/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçassions/n' écer
SFX c1 éger égeassions/n' éger
SFX c1 er assiez/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçassiez/n' écer
SFX c1 éger égeassiez/n' éger
SFX c1 er assent/n'q' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçassent/n'q' écer
SFX c1 éger égeassent/n'q' éger
SFX c1 ébrer èbre/n' ébrer
SFX c1 écer èce/n' écer
SFX c1 écher èche/n' écher
SFX c1 écrer ècre/n' écrer
SFX c1 éder ède/n' éder
SFX c1 éger ège/n' éger
SFX c1 égler ègle/n' égler
SFX c1 égner ègne/n' égner
SFX c1 égrer ègre/n' égrer
SFX c1 éguer ègue/n' éguer
SFX c1 éler èle/n' éler
SFX c1 émer ème/n' émer
SFX c1 éner ène/n' éner
SFX c1 éper èpe/n' éper
SFX c1 équer èque/n' équer
SFX c1 érer ère/n' érer
SFX c1 éser èse/n' éser
SFX c1 éter ète/n' éter
SFX c1 étrer ètre/n' étrer
SFX c1 évrer èvre/n' évrer
SFX c1 éyer èye/n' éyer
SFX c1 er ons/n' [^cg]er
SFX c1 écer éçons/n' écer
SFX c1 éger égeons/n' éger
SFX c1 er ez/n' er
