xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.dic
afférer/c1p.
anhéler/c1p.
empiéter/c1p.
intercéder/c1p.
interférer/c1p.
